pl: Rozmiar: 0; 0–3 mies.; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 lat; 11-12 lat; 12; 12-13 lat; 12–18 mies.; 13-14 lat; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 mies.; 1X; 2; 2–3 lata; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 lata; 3–6 mies.; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 lat; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 lat; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 lat; 6–9 mies.; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 lat; 7XL; 8; 8-9 lat; 8XL; 9-10 lat; 9–12 mies.; Double extra large (XXL); Rozmiar XXS; Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Rozmiar 5XL; Rozmiar 4XL; Large (L); Medium (M); Jeden rozmiar; Rozmiar 6XL; Small (S); Triple extra large (XXXL); Rozmiar XXXS; Inne
it: Dimensione: 0; 0-3 mesi; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 anni; 11-12 anni; 12; 12-13 anni; 12-18 mesi; 13-14 anni; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 mesi; 1X; 2; 2-3 anni; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 anni; 3-6 mesi; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 anni; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 anni; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 anni; 6-9 mesi; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 anni; 7XL; 8; 8-9 anni; 8XL; 9-10 anni; 9-12 mesi; Doppia XL (XXL); Doppia XS (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Cinque XL (5XL); Quattro XL (4XL); Large (L); Medium (M); Taglia unica; Sei XL (6XL); Small (S); Tripla XL (XXXL); Tripla XS (XXXS); Altro
da: Størrelse: 0; 0-3 måneder; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 år; 11-12 år; 12; 12-13 år; 12-18 måneder; 13-14 år; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 måneder; 1X; 2; 2-3 år; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 år; 3-6 måneder; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 år; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 år; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 år; 6-9 måneder; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 år; 7XL; 8; 8-9 år; 8XL; 9-10 år; 9-12 måneder; XXL; XXS; XL; XS; 5XL; 4XL; Large (L); Medium (M); One-size; 6XL; Small (S); XXXL; XXXS; Andet
lt-LT: Dydis: 0; 0–3 mėn.; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10–11 metų; 11–12 metų; 12; 12–13 metų; 12–18 mėn.; 13–14 metų; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 mėn.; 1X; 2; 2–3 metai; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 metai; 3–6 mėn.; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 metai; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 metai; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6–7 metų; 6–9 mėn.; 60; 6T; 6X; 7–8 metų; 7XL; 8; 8–9 metų; 8XL; 9–10 metų; 9–12 mėn.; 2XL (XXL); 2XS (XXS); Itin didelis (XL); Itin mažas (XS); XXXXXL (5XL); XXXXL (4XL); Didelis (L); Vidutinis (M); Universalus; XXXXXXL (6XL); Mažas (S); 3XL (XXXL); 3XS (XXXS); Kita
fi: Koko: 0; 0–3 kuukautta; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10–11 vuotta; 11–12 vuotta; 12; 12–13 vuotta; 12–18 kuukautta; 13–14 vuotta; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 kuukautta; 1X; 2; 2–3 vuotta; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 vuotta; 3–6 kuukautta; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 vuotta; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 vuotta; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6–7 vuotta; 6–9 kuukautta; 60; 6T; 6X; 7–8 vuotta; 7XL; 8; 8–9 vuotta; 8XL; 9–10 vuotta; 9–12 kuukautta; Erittäin erittäin suuri (XXL); XXS; Erittäin suuri (XL); Erittäin pieni (XS); XXXXXL; XXXXL; Suuri (L); Keskikokoinen (M); Yksi koko; XXXXXXL; Pieni (S); 3 erittäin suuri (XXXL); XXXS; Muu
hu: Méret: 0; 0-3 hónapos; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 éveseknek; 11-12 éveseknek; 12; 12-13 éveseknek; 12-18 hónapos; 13-14 éveseknek; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 hónapos; 1X; 2; 2-3 éves; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 éves; 3-6 hónapos; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 éves; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 éves; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 éveseknek; 6-9 hónapos; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 éveseknek; 7XL; 8; 8-9 éveseknek; 8XL; 9-10 éveseknek; 9-12 hónapos; Dupla extra nagy (XXL); Dupla extra kicsi (XXS); Extra nagy (XL); Extra kicsi (XS); Ötszörös extra nagy (5XL); Négyszeres extra nagy (4XL); Nagy (L); Közepes (M); Egy méret; Hatszoros extra nagy (6XL); Kicsi (S); Tripla extra nagy (XXXL); Tripla extra kicsi (XXXS); Egyéb
el: Μέγεθος: 0; 0-3 μηνών; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 ετών; 11-12 ετών; 12; 12-13 ετών; 12-18 μηνών; 13-14 ετών; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 μηνών; 1X; 2; 2-3 ετών; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 ετών; 3-6 μηνών; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 ετών; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 ετών; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 ετών; 6-9 μηνών; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 ετών; 7XL; 8; 8-9 ετών; 8XL; 9-10 ετών; 9-12 μηνών; Δύο extra large (XXL); Δύο extra small (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Πέντε extra large (5XL); Τέσσερα extra large (4XL); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Έξι extra large (6XL); Small (S); Τρία extra large (XXXL); Τρία extra small (XXXS); Άλλο
ko: 사이즈: 0; 0~3개월; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11세; 11-12세; 12; 12-13세; 12~18개월; 13-14세; 14; 16; 18; 18~24개월; 1X; 2; 2~3년; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3~4년; 3~6개월; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4~5년; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5~6년; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7세; 6~9개월; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8세; 7XL; 8; 8-9세; 8XL; 9-10세; 9~12개월; 2XL(XXL); 2XS(XXS); XL(XL); XS(XS); 5XL(5XL); 4XL(4XL); 라지(L); 미디엄(M); 단일 사이즈; 6XL(6XL); 스몰(S); 3XL(XXXL); 3XS(XXXS); 기타
zh-TW: 尺寸: 0; 0-3 個月; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 歲; 11-12 歲; 12; 12-13 歲; 12-18 個月; 13-14 歲; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 個月; 1X; 2; 2-3 歲; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 歲; 3-6 個月; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 歲; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 歲; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 歲; 6-9 個月; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 歲; 7XL; 8; 8-9 歲; 8XL; 9-10 歲; 9-12 個月; 超特大號 (XXL); 超特小號 (XXS); 特大號 (XL); 特小號 (XS); 五倍特大號 (5XL); 四倍特大號 (4XL); 大號 (L); 中號（M）; 單一尺碼; 六倍特大號 (6XL); 小 (S); 超特大號 (XXXL); 三倍特小號 (XXXS); 其他
sl-SI: Velikost: 0; 0–3 mesecev; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10–11 let; 11–12 let; 12; 12–13 let; 12–18 mesecev; 13–14 let; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 mesecev; 1X; 2; 2–3 let; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 let; 3–6 mesecev; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 let; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 let; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6–7 let; 6–9 mesecev; 60; 6T; 6X; 7–8 let; 7XL; 8; 8–9 let; 8XL; 9–10 let; 9–12 mesecev; Dvojna ekstra velika (XXL); Dvojna ekstra majhna (XXS); Ekstra velika (XL); Ekstra majhna (XS); Petkratna ekstra velika (5XL); Štirikratna ekstra velika (4XL); Velika (L); Srednja (M); Ena velikost; Šestkratna ekstra velika (6XL); Majhna (S); Trojna ekstra velika (XXXL); Trojna ekstra majhna (XXXS); Drugo
vi: Kích cỡ: 0; 0-3 tháng; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 tuổi; 11-12 tuổi; 12; 12-13 tuổi; 12-18 tháng; 13-14 tuổi; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 tháng; 1X; 2; 2-3 tuổi; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 tuổi; 3-6 tháng; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 tuổi; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 tuổi; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 tuổi; 6-9 tháng; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 tuổi; 7XL; 8; 8-9 tuổi; 8XL; 9-10 tuổi; 9-12 tháng; Rất rất lớn (XXL); Cực cực nhỏ (XXS); Rất lớn (XL); Rất nhỏ (XS); 5 cực lớn (5XL); 4 cực lớn (4XL); Lớn (L); Trung bình (M); Một cỡ; 6 cực lớn (6XL); Nhỏ (S); Siêu lớn (XXXL); 3 cực nhỏ (XXXS); Khác
th: ขนาด: 0; 0-3 เดือน; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 ปี; 11-12 ปี; 12; 12-13 ปี; 12-18 เดือน; 13-14 ปี; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 เดือน; 1X; 2; 2-3 ปี; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 ปี; 3-6 เดือน; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 ปี; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 ปี; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 ปี; 6-9 เดือน; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 ปี; 7XL; 8; 8-9 ปี; 8XL; 9-10 ปี; 9-12 เดือน; ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษสองเท่า (XXL); ขนาดเล็กพิเศษสองเท่า (XXS); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ (XL); ขนาดเล็กพิเศษ (XS); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษห้าเท่า (5XL); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษสี่เท่า (4XL); ขนาดใหญ่ (L); ขนาดกลาง (M); ไซส์เดียว; ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษหกเท่า (6XL); ขนาดเล็ก (S); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษสามเท่า (XXXL); ขนาดเล็กพิเศษสามเท่า (XXXS); อื่นๆ
sv: Storlek: 0; 0–3 månader; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10–11 år; 11–12 år; 12; 12–13 år; 12–18 månader; 13–14 år; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 månader; 1X; 2; 2–3 år; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 år; 3–6 månader; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 år; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 år; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6–7 år; 6–9 månader; 60; 6T; 6X; 7–8 år; 7XL; 8; 8–9 år; 8XL; 9–10 år; 9–12 månader; Dubbel extra large (XXL); Dubbel extra small (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Fem extra large (5XL); Fyra extra large (4XL); Large (L); Medium (M); En storlek; Sex extra large (6XL); Small (S); Tredubbel extra large (XXXL); Tredubbel extra small (XXXS); Övrigt
de: Größe: 0; 0–3 Monate; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 Jahre; 11-12 Jahre; 12; 12-13 Jahre; 12 – 18 Monate; 13-14 Jahre; 14; 16; 18; 18 – 24 Monate; 1X; 2; 2–3 Jahre; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3 – 4 Jahre; 3–6 Monate; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4 – 5 Jahre; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5 – 6 Jahre; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 Jahre; 6 – 9 Monate; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 Jahre; 7XL; 8; 8-9 Jahre; 8XL; 9-10 Jahre; 9 – 12 Monate; XXL; XXS; XL; XS; 5XL; 4XL; L; M; Einheitsgröße; 6XL; S; XXXL; XXXS; Sonstiges
cs: Velikost: 0; 0–3 měsíce; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10–11 let; 11–12 let; 12; 12–13 let; 12–18 měsíců; 13–14 let; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 měsíců; 1X; 2; 2–3 roky; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 roky; 3–6 měsíců; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 let; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 let; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6–7 let; 6–9 měsíců; 60; 6T; 6X; 7–8 let; 7XL; 8; 8–9 let; 8XL; 9–10 let; 9–12 měsíců; Velmi velmi velké (XXL); Velmi velmi malé (XXS); Velmi velké (XL); Velmi malé (XS); Velmi velmi velmi velmi velmi velké (5XL); Velmi velmi velmi velmi velké (4XL); Velké (L); Střední (M); Jedna velikost; Velmi velmi velmi velmi velmi velmi velké (6XL); Malé (S); Velmi velmi velmi velké (XXXL); Velmi velmi velmi malé (XXS); Jiné
en: Size: 0; 0-3 months; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 years; 11-12 years; 12; 12-13 years; 12-18 months; 13-14 years; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 months; 1X; 2; 2-3 years; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 years; 3-6 months; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 years; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 years; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 years; 6-9 months; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 years; 7XL; 8; 8-9 years; 8XL; 9-10 years; 9-12 months; Double extra large (XXL); Double extra small (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Five extra large (5XL); Four extra large (4XL); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Six extra large (6XL); Small (S); Triple extra large (XXXL); Triple extra small (XXXS); Other
sk-SK: Veľkosť: 0; 0-3 mesiace; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10 – 11 rokov; 11 – 12 rokov; 12; 12 – 13 rokov; 12-18 mesiacov; 13 – 14 rokov; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 mesiacov; 1X; 2; 2-3 roky; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 roky; 3-6 mesiacov; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 rokov; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 rokov; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6 – 7 rokov; 6-9 mesiacov; 60; 6T; 6X; 7 – 8 rokov; 7XL; 8; 8 – 9 rokov; 8XL; 9 – 10 rokov; 9-12 mesiacov; Dvojitý extra veľký (XXL); Dvojitý extra malý (XXS); Extra veľký (XL); Extra malý (XS); Pätoritý extra veľký (5XL); Štvortýi extra veľký (4XL); Veľký (L); Stredný (M); Jedna veľkosť; Šesť extra veľký (6XL); Malý (S); Trojitý extra veľký (XXXL); Trojitý extra malý (XXXS); Iné
nb: Størrelse: 0; 0–3 måneder; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10–11 år; 11–12 år; 12; 12–13 år; 12–18 måneder; 13–14 år; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 måneder; 1X; 2; 2–3 år; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 år; 3–6 måneder; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 år; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 år; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6–7 år; 6–9 måneder; 60; 6T; 6X; 7–8 år; 7XL; 8; 8–9 år; 8XL; 9–10 år; 9–12 måneder; Dobbel ekstra stor (XXL); Dobbel ekstra liten (XXS); Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra liten (XS); Fem ekstra stor (5XL); Fire ekstra stor (4XL); Stor (L); Middels (M); Én størrelse; Seks ekstra stor (6XL); Liten (S); Trippel ekstra stor (XXXL); Trippel ekstra liten (XXXS); Annet
pt-BR: Tamanho: 0; 0-3 meses; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10 a 11 anos; 11 a 12 anos; 12; 12 a 13 anos; 12-18 meses; 13 a 14 anos; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 meses; 1X; 2; 2-3 anos; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 anos; 3-6 meses; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 anos; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 anos; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6 a 7 anos; 6-9 meses; 60; 6T; 6X; 7 a 8 anos; 7XL; 8; 8 a 9 anos; 8XL; 9 a 10 anos; 9-12 meses; Duplo extra grande (XXG); Duplo extra pequeno (XXS); Extra grande (XG); Extra pequeno (XP); Cinco extra grande (5XL); Quatro extra grande (4XL); Grande (G); Médio (M); Tamanho único; Seis extra grande (6XL); Pequeno (P); Triplo extra grande (XXXG); Triplo extra pequeno (SXXS); Outro
es: Talla: 0; 0 a 3 meses; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 años; 11-12 años; 12; 12-13 años; 12 a 18 meses; 13-14 años; 14; 16; 18; 18 a 24 meses; 1X; 2; 2 a 3 años; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3 a 4 años; 3 a 6 meses; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4 a 5 años; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5 a 6 años; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 años; 6 a 9 meses; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 años; 7XL; 8; 8-9 años; 8XL; 9-10 años; 9 a 12 meses; Doble extragrande (XXL); Doble extrapequeño (XXS); Extragrande (XL); Extrapequeño (XS); Cinco extragrande (5XL); Cuatro extragrande (4XL); Grande (L); Mediano (M); Talla única; Seis extragrande (6XL); Pequeño (S); Triple extragrande (XXXL); Triple extrapequeño (XXXS); Otros
bg-BG: Размер: 0; 0-3 месеца; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 години; 11-12 години; 12; 12-13 години; 12-18 месеца; 13-14 години; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 месеца; 1X; 2; 2-3 години; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 години; 3-6 месеца; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 години; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 години; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 години; 6-9 месеца; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 години; 7XL; 8; 8-9 години; 8XL; 9-10 години; 9-12 месеца; Двойно екстра голямо (XXL); Двойно екстра малко (XXS); Екстра голямо (XL); Екстра малко (XS); Пет екстра голямо (5XL); Четири екстра голямо (4XL); Голямо (L); Средно (M); Един размер; Шест екстра голямо (6XL); Малко (S); Тройно екстра голямо (XXL); Тройно екстра малко (XXS); Други
ru: Размер: 0; 0–3 мес.; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 лет; 11-12 лет; 12; 12-13 лет; 12–18 мес.; 13-14 лет; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 мес.; 1X; 2; 2–3 года; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 года; 3–6 мес.; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 лет; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 лет; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 лет; 6–9 мес.; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 лет; 7XL; 8; 8-9 лет; 8XL; 9-10 лет; 9–12 мес.; Двойной очень большой (XXL); Двойной очень маленький (XXS); Очень большой (XL); Очень маленький (XS); Пятый очень большой (5XL); Четвертый очень большой (4XL); Большой (L); Средний (М); Безразмерный; Шестой очень большой (6XL); Маленький (S); Тройной очень большой (XXXL); Тройной очень маленький (XXXS); Другое
ja: サイズ: 0; 0～3か月; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11歳; 11-12歳; 12; 12-13歳; 1才〜1才半; 13-14歳; 14; 16; 18; 1才半〜2才; 1X; 2; 2～3才; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3〜4才; 3～6か月; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4〜5才; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5〜6才; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7歳; 6〜9か月; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8歳; 7XL; 8; 8-9歳; 8XL; 9-10歳; 9か月〜1才; ダブルエクストララージ (XXL); ダブルエクストラスモール (XXS); エクストララージ (XL); エクストラスモール (XS); 5エクストララージ (5XL); 4エクストララージ (4XL); ラージ (L); ミディアム (M); ワンサイズ; 6エクストララージ (6XL); スモール (S); トリプルエクストララージ (XXXL); トリプルエクストラスモール (XXXS); その他
fr: Taille: 0; 0 à 3 mois; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 ans; 11-12 ans; 12; 12-13 ans; 12 à 18 mois; 13-14 ans; 14; 16; 18; 18 à 24 mois; 1X; 2; 3 ans; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 4 ans; 3 à 6 mois; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 5 ans; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 6 ans; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 ans; 6 à 9 mois; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 ans; 7XL; 8; 8-9 ans; 8XL; 9-10 ans; 9 à 12 mois; Double XL (XXL); Double très petit (XXS); Extra large (XL); Très petite taille (XS); Cinq très grand (5XL); Quatre extra larges (4XL); Taille large (L); Taille moyenne (M); Taille unique; Six extra larges (6XL); Petite taille (S); Triple XL (XXL); Triple très petit (XXS); Autre
pt-PT: Tamanho: 0; 0–3 meses; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 anos; 11-12 anos; 12; 12-13 anos; 12–18 meses; 13-14 anos; 14; 16; 18; 18–24 meses; 1X; 2; 2–3 anos; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3–4 anos; 3–6 meses; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4–5 anos; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5–6 anos; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 anos; 6–9 meses; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 anos; 7XL; 8; 8-9 anos; 8XL; 9-10 anos; 9–12 meses; Duplo extra grande (XXL); Duplo extra pequeno (XXS); Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeno (XS); Cinco extra grande (5XL); Quatro extra grande (4XL); Grande (L); Médio (M); Tamanho único; Seis extra grande (6XL); Pequeno (S); Triplo extra grande (XXXL); Triplo extra pequeno (XXXS); Outro
ro-RO: Dimensiune: 0; 0-3 luni; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 ani; 11-12 ani; 12; 12-13 ani; 12-18 luni; 13-14 ani; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 luni; 1X; 2; 2-3 ani; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 ani; 3-6 luni; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 ani; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 ani; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 ani; 6-9 luni; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 ani; 7XL; 8; 8-9 ani; 8XL; 9-10 ani; 9-12 luni; Double extra large (XXL); Double extra small (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Five extra large (5XL); Four extra large (4XL); Large (L); Medium (M); Mărime universală; Six extra large (6XL); Small (S); Triple extra large (XXXL); Triple extra small (XXXS); Altele
nl: Maat: 0; 0-3 maanden; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 jaar; 11-12 jaar; 12; 12-13 jaar; 12-18 maanden; 13-14 jaar; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 maanden; 1X; 2; 2-3 jaar; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 jaar; 3-6 maanden; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 jaar; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 jaar; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 jaar; 6-9 maanden; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 jaar; 7XL; 8; 8-9 jaar; 8XL; 9-10 jaar; 9-12 maanden; Dubbel extra groot (XXL); Dusbbel extra klein (XXS); Extra groot (XL); Extra klein (XS); Vijf extra groot (5XL); Vier extra groot (4XL); Groot (L); Middel (M); Een maat; Zes extra groot (6XL); Klein (S); Driedubbel extra groot (XXXL); Driedubbel extra klein (XXXS); Andere
zh-CN: 尺寸: 0; 0-3 个月; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 岁; 11-12 岁; 12; 12-13 岁; 12-18 个月; 13-14 岁; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 个月; 1X; 2; 2-3 岁; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 岁; 3-6 个月; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 岁; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 岁; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 岁; 6-9 个月; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 岁; 7XL; 8; 8-9 岁; 8XL; 9-10 岁; 9-12 个月; 超特大号 (XXL); 超特小号 (XXS); 特大号 (XL); 特小号 (XS); 五加特大号 (5XL); 四加特大号 (4XL); 大号 (L); 中号 (M); 均码; 六加特大号 (6XL); 小号 (S); 三加特大号 (XXL); 三加特小号 (XXXS); 其他
hr-HR: Veličina: 0; 0 – 3 mjeseca; 00; 000; 0X; 1; 10; 10 – 11 godina; 11 – 12 godina; 12; 12 – 13 godina; 12 – 18 mjeseci; 13 – 14 godina; 14; 16; 18; 18 – 24 mjeseca; 1X; 2; 2 – 3 godine; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3 – 4 godine; 3 – 6 mjeseci; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4 – 5 godina; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5 – 6 godina; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6 – 7 godina; 6 – 9 mjeseci; 60; 6T; 6X; 7 – 8 godina; 7XL; 8; 8 – 9 godina; 8XL; 9 – 10 godina; 9 – 12 mjeseci; Dvostruko ekstra veliko (XXL); Dvostruko ekstra malo (XXS); Ekstra veliko (XL); Ekstra malo (XS); Peterostruko ekstra veliko (5XL); Četverostruko ekstra veliko (4XL); Veliko (L); Srednje (M); Univerzalna veličina; Šesterostruko ekstra veliko (6XL); Malo (S); Trostruko ekstra veliko (XXXL); Trostruko ekstra malo (XXS); Ostalo
tr: Boyut: 0; 0-3 ay; 0; 0; 0X; 1; 10; 10-11 yaş; 11-12 yaş; 12; 12-13 yaş; 12-18 ay; 13-14 yaş; 14; 16; 18; 18-24 ay; 1X; 2; 2-3 yıl; 20; 22; 24; 26; 28; 2T; 2X; 3-4 yıl; 3-6 ay; 30; 32; 34; 36; 38; 3T; 3X; 4; 4-5 yıl; 40; 42; 44; 46; 48; 4T; 4X; 5-6 yıl; 50; 52; 54; 56; 58; 5T; 5X; 6; 6-7 yaş; 6-9 ay; 60; 6T; 6X; 7-8 yaş; 7XL; 8; 8-9 yaş; 8XL; 9-10 yaş; 9-12 ay; İki X large (XXL); İki X small (XXS); X large (XL); X small (XS); Beş X large (5XL); Dört X large (4XL); Large (L); Medium (M); Tek beden; Altı X large (6XL); Small (S); Üç X large (XXXL); Üç X small (XXXS); Diğer